Utah statutes.
57-8-3.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Assessment" means any charge imposed by the association, including
common expenses on or against a unit owner pursuant to the provisions of the
declaration, bylaws, or this chapter.
(2)  "Association of unit owners" means all of the unit owners:
(a)  acting as a group in accordance with the declaration and bylaws; or
(b)  organized as a legal entity in accordance with the declaration.
(3)  "Building" means a building, containing units, and comprising a part of
the property.
(4)  "Common areas and facilities" unless otherwise provided in the
declaration or lawful amendments to the declaration means:
(a)  the land included within the condominium project, whether leasehold or in
fee simple;
(b)  the foundations, columns, girders, beams, supports, main walls, roofs,
halls, corridors, lobbies, stairs, stairways, fire escapes, entrances, and
exits of the building;
(c)  the basements, yards, gardens, parking areas, and storage spaces;
(d)  the premises for lodging of janitors or persons in charge of the
property;
(e)  installations of central services such as power, light, gas, hot and cold
water, heating, refrigeration, air conditioning, and incinerating;
(f)  the elevators, tanks, pumps, motors, fans, compressors, ducts, and in
general all apparatus and installations existing for common use;
(g)  such community and commercial facilities as may be provided for in the
declaration; and
(h)  all other parts of the property necessary or convenient to its existence,
maintenance, and safety, or normally in common use.
(5)  "Common expenses" means:
(a)  all sums lawfully assessed against the unit owners;
(b)  expenses of administration, maintenance, repair, or replacement of the
common areas and facilities;
(c)  expenses agreed upon as common expenses by the association of unit
owners; and
(d)  expenses declared common expenses by this chapter, or by the declaration
or the bylaws.
(6)  "Common profits," unless otherwise provided in the declaration or lawful
amendments to the declaration, means the balance of all income, rents,
profits, and revenues from the common areas and facilities remaining after the
deduction of the common expenses.
(7)  "Condominium" means the ownership of a single unit in a multiunit project
together with an undivided interest in common in the common areas and
facilities of the property.
(8)  "Condominium plat" means a plat or plats of survey of land and units
prepared in accordance with Section 57-8-13.
(9)  "Condominium project" means a real estate condominium project; a plan or
project whereby two or more units, whether contained in existing or proposed
apartments, commercial or industrial buildings or structures, or otherwise,
are separately offered or proposed to be offered for sale.  Condominium
project also means the property when the context so requires.
(10)  "Condominium unit" means a unit together with the undivided interest in
the common areas and facilities appertaining to that unit.  Any reference in
this chapter to a condominium unit includes both a physical unit together with
its appurtenant undivided interest in the common areas and facilities and a
time period unit together with its appurtenant undivided interest, unless the
reference is specifically limited to a time period unit.
(11)  "Contractible condominium" means a condominium project from which one or
more portions of the land within the project may be withdrawn in accordance
with provisions of the declaration and of this chapter.  If the withdrawal can
occur only by the expiration or termination of one or more leases, then the
condominium project is not a contractible condominium within the meaning of
this chapter.
(12)  "Convertible land" means a building site which is a portion of the
common areas and facilities, described by metes and bounds, within which
additional units or limited common areas and facilities may be created in
accordance with this chapter.
(13)  "Convertible space" means a portion of the structure within the
condominium project, which portion may be converted into one or more units or
common areas and facilities, including limited common areas and facilities in
accordance with this chapter.
(14)  "Declarant" means all persons who execute the declaration or on whose
behalf the declaration is executed.  From the time of the recordation of any
amendment to the declaration expanding an expandable condominium, all persons
who execute that amendment or on whose behalf that amendment is executed shall
also come within this definition.  Any successors of the persons referred to
in this subsection who come to stand in the same relation to the condominium
project as their predecessors also come within this definition.
(15)  "Declaration" means the instrument by which the property is submitted to
the provisions of this act, as it from time to time may be lawfully amended.
(16)  "Expandable condominium" means a condominium project to which additional
land or an interest in it may be added in accordance with the declaration and
this chapter.
(17)  "Leasehold condominium" means a condominium project in all or any
portion of which each unit owner owns an estate for years in his unit, or in
the land upon which that unit is situated, or both, with all those leasehold
interests to expire naturally at the same time.  A condominium project
including leased land, or an interest in the land, upon which no units are
situated or to be situated is not a leasehold condominium within the meaning
of this chapter.
(18)  "Limited common areas and facilities" means those common areas and
facilities designated in the declaration as reserved for use of a certain unit
or units to the exclusion of the other units.
(19)  "Majority" or "majority of the unit owners," unless otherwise provided
in the declaration or lawful amendments to the declaration, means the owners
of more than 50% in the aggregate in interest of the undivided ownership of
the common areas and facilities.
(20)  "Management committee" means the committee as provided in the
declaration charged with and having the responsibility and authority to make
and to enforce all of the reasonable rules covering the operation and
maintenance of the property.
(21)  "Par value" means a number of dollars or points assigned to each unit by
the declaration.  Substantially identical units shall be assigned the same par
value, but units located at substantially different heights above the ground,
or having substantially different views, or having substantially different
amenities or other characteristics that might result in differences in market
value, may be considered substantially identical within the meaning of this
subsection.  If par value is stated in terms of dollars, that statement may
not be considered to reflect or control the sales price or fair market value
of any unit, and no opinion, appraisal, or fair market transaction at a
different figure may affect the par value of any unit, or any undivided
interest in the common areas and facilities, voting rights in the unit owners'
association, liability for common expenses, or right to common profits,
assigned on the basis thereof.
(22)  "Person" means an individual, corporation, partnership, association,
trustee, or other legal entity.
(23)  "Property" means the land, whether leasehold or in fee simple, the
building, if any, all improvements and structures thereon, all easements,
rights, and appurtenances belonging thereto, and all articles of personal
property intended for use in connection therewith.
(24)  "Record," "recording," "recorded," and "recorder" have the meaning
stated in Title 57, Chapter 3, Recording of Documents.
(25)  "Size" means the number of cubic feet, or the number of square feet of
ground or floor space, within each unit as computed by reference to the record
of survey map and rounded off to a whole number.  Certain spaces within the
units including attic, basement, or garage space may be omitted from the
calculation or be partially discounted by the use of a ratio, if the same
basis of calculation is employed for all units in the condominium project and
if that basis is described in the declaration.
(26)  "Time period unit" means an annually recurring part or parts of a year
specified in the declaration as a period for which a unit is separately owned
and includes a timeshare estate as defined in Subsection 57-19-2(17).
(27)  "Unit" means either a separate physical part of the property intended
for any type of independent use, including one or more rooms or spaces located
in one or more floors or part or parts of floors in a building or a time
period unit, as the context may require.  A convertible space shall be treated
as a unit in accordance with Subsection 57-8-13.4(3).  A proposed condominium
unit under an expandable condominium project, not constructed, is a unit two
years after the date the recording requirements of Section 57-8-13.6 are met.
(28)  "Unit number" means the number, letter, or combination of numbers and
letters designating the unit in the declaration and in the record of survey
map.
(29)  "Unit owner" means the person or persons owning a unit in fee simple and
an undivided interest in the fee simple estate of the common areas and
facilities in the percentage specified and established in the declaration or,
in the case of a leasehold condominium project, the person or persons whose
leasehold interest or interests in the condominium unit extend for the entire
balance of the unexpired term or terms.
